Nevada, session 83, SB508.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
the sum of $122,083 for the costs of implementing the provisions
relating to union leave in the collective bargaining agreement
covering personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (m) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
-
*SB508*

– 2 –
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
the sum of $21,155,823 for the costs of implementing the provisions
of the collective bargaining agreement covering personnel
represented by the bargaining unit established in paragraph (n) of
subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB508*